West Virginia, session 2025, HB3211.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. FIRE MARSHAL. §15A-10-26. Cancer prevention programs for firefighters. (a) During the annual periodic health assessment of each firefighter, the state shall provide, at no cost to the firefighter, appropriate medical testing and related services to detect, document the presence or absence of, and prevent, certain cancers using available multi-cancer early detection testing.(b) The state shall jointly establish a voluntary program through which firefighting personnel may share with the Department of Human Services the results of multi-cancer early detection testing or other forms of preventative tests in order to identify any trends or causes of cancer in such personnel. Any results shall be shared in an anonymized, de-identified manner that safeguards the personally identifiable information of the personnel in order to prevent attribution to any personnel of any such shared results.